Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.150

School breakfast and lunch programs—Grants to increase participation—Increased state support.

(1)(a) To the extent funds are appropriated for this specific purpose, the superintendent of public instruction may award grants to school districts to:

(i) Increase awareness of and participation in school breakfast and lunch programs, including breakfast after the bell programs;

(ii) Improve program quality, including the nutritional content of program food and the promotion of nutritious food choices by students;

(iii) Promote innovative school-based programs, including but not limited to developing gardens that provide produce used in school breakfast or lunch programs; and

(iv) Improve the equipment and facilities used in the programs.

(b) If applicable, school districts shall demonstrate that they have applied for applicable federal funds before applying for funds under this subsection.

(2) To the extent funds are appropriated for this specific purpose, the superintendent of public instruction shall increase the state support for school breakfasts and lunches, including breakfast after the bell programs.

(3) As used in this section, "breakfast after the bell" has the definition in RCW 28A.235.200.

[ 2018 c 8 s 7; 1993 c 333 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2018 c 8: See notes following RCW 28A.235.210.